Utah statutes.
61-1-19.   Investigations authorized.

(1) (a)  The division may make any public or private investigations within or without this state as the division considers necessary to determine whether a person has violated, is violating, or is about to violate this chapter or a rule or order issued under this chapter.

(b)  To aid in the enforcement of this chapter or in the prescribing of rules and forms issued under this chapter, the division may require or permit a person to file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise as to all the facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated.

(c)  The division may publish information concerning a violation of this chapter or the violation of a rule or order issued under this chapter.

(2)  For the purpose of an investigation or proceeding under this chapter, the division, the commission, or an employee designated by the division may:

(a)  administer an oath or affirmation;

(b)  subpoena a witness and compel the attendance of the witness;

(c)  take evidence; and

(d)  require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records  relevant or material to the investigation.



Amended by Chapter 351, 2009 General Session

